Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-417
Existing commission, board of appeals; regulations, decisions; continuance.

Where there already exist a city planning commission and a board of appeals, their continuance is hereby authorized without further act of the city council. All ordinances, rules and regulations, hearings, orders or decisions existing or in effect on April 1, 1925, or substituted or in effect thereafter, shall continue in effect, except insofar as any such shall be in conflict with the provisions hereof.

Laws 1925, c. 45, § 11, p. 185;

C.S.1929, § 14-414;

R.S.1943, § 14-417.